Massachusetts, session 194th, H272.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the department of transitional
assistance shall provide financial assistance to an otherwise eligible pregnant person with no
dependent child beginning when the pregnancy is verified, provided that such assistance shall be
the amount for one person under the transitional aid to families with dependent children
program.
of 1